Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.155

Conditional release, furlough—Secretary's recommendation.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

No court may, without a hearing, enter an order conditionally releasing or authorizing the furlough of a person committed under this chapter, unless the secretary has recommended the release or furlough. If the secretary has not recommended the release or furlough, a hearing shall be held under RCW 10.77.150.

[ 1994 c 150 s 1.]